Utah statutes.
63B-8-304.   General provisions -- Funds and accounts.

(1) (a)  Sections 63B-8-205, 63B-8-206, 63B-8-213, 63B-8-214, 63B-8-215, and 63B-8-216 apply to any notes or renewals of notes issued under this part.

(b) (i)  For purposes of this part, any action that those sections require or permit the commission to take shall be considered sufficient if taken by the state treasurer.

(ii)  The treasurer may take action by issuing a written order, or in some other manner that he finds necessary or convenient, to accomplish the purposes of this part.

(2)  The treasurer may:

(a)  in a written order, establish whatever funds and accounts are necessary or desirable to carry out the purposes of this part; and

(b)  until the money is needed for the purpose for which the fund or account was created, invest the money held in those funds and accounts by following the procedures and requirements of Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act.



Amended by Chapter 342, 2011 General Session

